Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-521
County treasurer; terms; qualifications; partisan ballot.

A county treasurer shall be elected in each county at the statewide general election in 1990 and each four years thereafter. The term of the county treasurer shall be four years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified. The county treasurer shall meet the qualifications found in section 23-1601.01. The county treasurer shall be elected on the partisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 117.